src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Ledit ! This entire thing is a mess. Good luck.
+Adj+Masc+Sg:ledit # ; 
+Adj+Masc+Sg:ledict # ; 
+Adj+Masc+Pl:lesdiz # ; 
+Adj+Fem+Sg:ladite # ; 
+Adj+Fem+Sg:laditte # ; 
+Adj+Fem+Sg:ladicte # ;
+Adj+Fem+Pl:lesdictes # ; 
+Prep+Adj+Masc+Sg:dudit # ; 
+Prep+Adj+Masc+Sg:dudict # ; 
+Prep+Adj+Masc+Sg:audit # ; 
+Prep+Adj+Masc+Sg:oudit # ; 
+Adj+Pro+Poss+Masc+Obl+Sg:sondit # ;
+Adj+Dem+Masc+Sg:cedit # ;
+Prep+Adj+Masc+Pl:desdiz # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
! Note: "grekue" forms will never appear, but show that rules are working correctly

!!€gt-norm: Adjectives
!!€ bones:          bon+Adj+Fem+Nom+Pl
!!€ bonnes:         bon+Adj+Fem+Nom+Pl
!!€ bones:          bon+Adj+Fem+Obl+Pl
!!€ bonnes:         bon+Adj+Fem+Obl+Pl
!!€ mieudre:        mieux+Adj+Masc+Nom+Sg
!!€ mieudre:        mieux+Adj+Fem+Nom+Sg
!!€ forz:           fort+Adj+Masc+Nom+Sg
!!€ forz:           fort+Adj+Masc+Obl+Pl
!!€ fors:           fort+Adj+Masc+Nom+Sg
!!€ fors:           fort+Adj+Masc+Obl+Pl
!!€ fortes:         fort+Adj+Fem+Nom+Pl
!!€ fortes:         fort+Adj+Fem+Obl+Pl
!!€ fores:          fort+Adj+Fem+Nom+Pl
!!€ fores:          fort+Adj+Fem+Obl+Pl
!!€ brief:          brief+Adj+Masc+Obl+Sg
!!€ brief:          brief+Adj+Masc+Nom+Pl
!!€ bries:          brief+Adj+Masc+Nom+Sg
!!€ bries:          brief+Adj+Masc+Obl+Pl
!!€ brieve:         brief+Adj+Fem+Nom+Sg
!!€ brieve:         brief+Adj+Fem+Obl+Sg
!!€ brieves:        brief+Adj+Fem+Nom+Pl
!!€ brieves:        brief+Adj+Fem+Obl+Pl
!!€ corteis:        corteis+Adj+Masc+Nom+Sg
!!€ corteis:        corteis+Adj+Masc+Obl+Sg
!!€ corteis:        corteis+Adj+Masc+Nom+Pl
!!€ corteis:        corteis+Adj+Masc+Obl+Pl
!!€ cortois:        corteis+Adj+Masc+Nom+Sg
!!€ cortois:        corteis+Adj+Masc+Obl+Sg
!!€ cortois:        corteis+Adj+Masc+Nom+Pl
!!€ cortois:        corteis+Adj+Masc+Obl+Pl
!!€ corteise:       corteis+Adj+Fem+Nom+Sg
!!€ corteise:       corteis+Adj+Fem+Obl+Sg
!!€ corteises:      corteis+Adj+Fem+Nom+Pl
!!€ corteises:      corteis+Adj+Fem+Obl+Pl
!!€ cortoise:       corteis+Adj+Fem+Nom+Sg
!!€ cortoise:       corteis+Adj+Fem+Obl+Sg
!!€ cortoises:      corteis+Adj+Fem+Nom+Pl
!!€ cortoises:      corteis+Adj+Fem+Obl+Pl
!!€ grec:           grec+Adj+Masc+Obl+Sg
!!€ grec:           grec+Adj+Masc+Nom+Pl
!!€ grecs:           grec+Adj+Masc+Nom+Sg
!!€ grecs:           grec+Adj+Masc+Obl+Pl
!!€ greque:         grec+Adj+Fem+Nom+Sg
!!€ greque:         grec+Adj+Fem+Obl+Sg
!!€ greques:        grec+Adj+Fem+Nom+Pl
!!€ greques:        grec+Adj+Fem+Obl+Pl
!!€ grekue:         grec+Adj+Fem+Nom+Sg
!!€ grekue:         grec+Adj+Fem+Obl+Sg
!!€ grekues:        grec+Adj+Fem+Nom+Pl
!!€ grekues:        grec+Adj+Fem+Obl+Pl
